si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 232 Y 145 
SFX 232 0 වෙනවා .
SFX 232 0 වෙමි .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෙමි .
SFX 232 0 වෙමු .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෙමු .
SFX 232 0 වෙහි .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෙහි .
SFX 232 0 වෙහු .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෙහු .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නේය .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නීය .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නාය .
SFX 232 0 වෙති .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෝය .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්න .
SFX 232 0 වෙව .
SFX 232 0 වෙනු .
SFX 232 0 වෙපිය .
SFX 232 0 වොපිය .
SFX 232 0 වෙපන් .
SFX 232 0 වොපන් .
SFX 232 0 වෙව් .
SFX 232 0 වෙපියව් .
SFX 232 0 වොපියව් .
SFX 232 0 වෙපල්ලා .
SFX 232 0 වොපල්ලා .
SFX 232 0 වෙනවාලා .
SFX 232 0 වෙයිලු .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නේලු .
SFX 232 0 වෙතිලු .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නෝලු .
SFX 232 0 වෙද්දෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වෙපුවාවේ .
SFX 232 0 වොපුවාවේ .
SFX 232 0 වෙපුදෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වොපුදෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වොවි .
SFX 232 0 වේවි .
SFX 232 0 වුවා . 	
SFX 232 0 වීමි .
SFX 232 0 වුවෙමි .
SFX 232 0 වූමු .
SFX 232 0 වුවෙමු . 
SFX 232 0 වීහි .
SFX 232 0 වුවෙහි .
SFX 232 0 වූහු .
SFX 232 0 වූහ .
SFX 232 0 වුවෙහු .
SFX 232 0 වීය .
SFX 232 0 වුවේය .
SFX 232 0 වුවාය .
SFX 232 0 වූහ .
SFX 232 0 වුවහ .
SFX 232 0 වුවෝය . 
SFX 232 0 වුවාලු .
SFX 232 0 වුවේලු .
SFX 232 0 වූහලු .
SFX 232 0 වුවහලු .
SFX 232 0 වුවෝලු . 
SFX 232 0 වුවාවේ .
SFX 232 0 වුවදෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වුණා .
SFX 232 0 වුණෙමි .
SFX 232 0 වුණෙමු .
SFX 232 0 වුණෙහි .
SFX 232 0 වුණෙහු .
SFX 232 0 වුණේය .
SFX 232 0 විණ .
SFX 232 0 විණි .
SFX 232 0 වුණි .
SFX 232 0 වීය . 
SFX 232 0 වුණාය .
SFX 232 0 වුණෝය .
SFX 232 0 වුණහ .
SFX 232 0 වියහ .
SFX 232 0 වුණාලු .
SFX 232 0 වුණේලු .
SFX 232 0 වුණහලු .
SFX 232 0 වුණෝලු .
SFX 232 0 වුණාවේ .
SFX 232 0 වුණදෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වුනා .
SFX 232 0 වුනෙමි .
SFX 232 0 වුනෙමු .
SFX 232 0 වුනෙහි .
SFX 232 0 වුනෙහු .
SFX 232 0 වුනේය .
SFX 232 0 වින .
SFX 232 0 විනි .
SFX 232 0 වුනි .
SFX 232 0 වුනාය .
SFX 232 0 වුනහ .
SFX 232 0 වුනෝය .
SFX 232 0 වුනාලු .
SFX 232 0 වුනේලු .
SFX 232 0 වුනහලු .
SFX 232 0 වුනෝලු .
SFX 232 0 වුනාවේ .
SFX 232 0 වුනදෙන් .
SFX 232 0 වූවා  .
SFX 232 0 වූවෙමි  .
SFX 232 0 වූවෙමු  . 
SFX 232 0 වූවෙහි  .
SFX 232 0 වූවෙහු  . 
SFX 232 0 වූවේය  .
SFX 232 0 වූවාය  .
SFX 232 0 වූවහ  .
SFX 232 0 වූවෝය  .
SFX 232 0 වූවාලු  .
SFX 232 0 වූවේලු  .
SFX 232 0 වූවහලු  .
SFX 232 0 වූවෝලු  .
SFX 232 0 වූවාවේ  .
SFX 232 0 වූවදෙන්  .
SFX 232 0 වූවාදෙන්  .
SFX 232 0 වූවපුදෙන්  . 
SFX 232 0 වනා .
SFX 232 0 වන .
SFX 232 0 වෙන .
SFX 232 0 වෙනා .
SFX 232 0 වූ .
SFX 232 0 වුණ .
SFX 232 0 වුණු .
SFX 232 0 ව .
SFX 232 0 වී .
SFX 232 0 වීලා .
SFX 232 0 වෙලා .
SFX 232 0 වමින් .
SFX 232 0 වෙමින් .
SFX 232 0 වත්ම .
SFX 232 0 වෙත්ම .
SFX 232 0 වන්න .
SFX 232 0 වන්නට .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්න .
SFX 232 0 වෙන්නට .
SFX 232 0 විය .
SFX 232 0 වද්දී .
SFX 232 0 වෙද්දී .
SFX 232 0 වතොත් .
SFX 232 0 වෙතොත් .
SFX 232 0 වුණොත් .
SFX 232 0 වුණොතින් .
SFX 232 0 වුවත් .
SFX 232 0 වෙතත් .
SFX 232 0 වුණත් .
